Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 CERTIFICATES OF TITLE
42-6-124. Disposition of certificates of title.

The director shall dispose of a certificate of title issued by the director or the authorized agent in the following manner:

If the certificate of title that is filed by the authorized agent is maintained in an electronic format within the director's and the authorized agent's motor and off-highway vehicle databases as required by the standards established pursuant to article 71.3 of title 24, C.R.S., the certificate of title shall be disposed of in accordance with paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection (1).

If it appears, from the records in the director's or the authorized agent's office and from an examination of the certificate of title, that the motor or off-highway vehicle described in the certificate of title is not subject to a mortgage filed after August 1, 1949, or if the vehicle is encumbered by a mortgage filed in any county of a state other than Colorado, the director or authorized agent shall deliver the certificate of title to the person who appears to be the owner of the vehicle or mail the certificate to the owner of the vehicle at his or her address as it appears in the application, the certificate of title, or other records in the director's or the authorized agent's office.

If it appears, from the records in the office of the director or the authorized agent and from the certificate of title, that the motor or off-highway vehicle described in the certificate of title is subject to one or more mortgages filed after August 1, 1949, the director or the authorized agent shall electronically maintain or deliver the certificate of title issued by the director to the mortgagee named in the certificate of title or the holder of the certificate of title whose mortgage was first filed in the office of an authorized agent.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2460, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1664, § 18, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) amended, p. 859, § 10, effective May 30.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2388, § 20, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-123 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-124 was relocated to § 42-6-125.

42-6-125. Release of mortgages - rules.

Upon the payment or discharge of the undertaking secured by a mortgage on a motor or off-highway vehicle that has been filed for record under section 42-6-121, the legal holder, on a form approved by the director, shall notify the director or authorized agent of the discharge of the obligation and release of the mortgage securing the obligation and set forth in the notice the facts concerning the right of the holder to release the mortgage as the director may require by rule. The lienholder shall include in the notice of satisfaction and release a signed affirmation, noted in the certificate of title on file with the director or the director's authorized agent, that contains or is accompanied by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S. Thereupon, the holder of the released mortgage shall dispose of the certificate of title as follows:

If the motor or off-highway vehicle is encumbered by a mortgage filed under section 42-6-121 after the date on which the released mortgage was filed for record, the holder of the certificate of title shall deliver the certificate to the person shown to be the holder of the mortgage noted on the title filed earliest after the filing of the released mortgage, or to the person or agent of the person shown to be the assignee or other legal holder of the mortgage, or shall mail the certificate to the mortgagee or holder at the address appearing on the mortgage. If the certificate is returned unclaimed, the holder shall mail the certificate to the director.

If it appears from an examination of the certificate of title that there are no other outstanding mortgages against the motor or off-highway vehicle upon the release of the mortgage as provided in this section, the holder of the mortgage shall deliver the certificate of title to the owner of the vehicle or shall mail the title to the owner at his or her address, and, if for any reason the certificate of title is not delivered to the owner or is returned unclaimed, the holder shall immediately mail the certificate to the director.

The director's authorized agent shall note in the electronic record of the lien the satisfaction and release of the lien or mortgage and shall file a notice of the satisfaction and release in accordance with section 42-6-122.

Except when a lienholder can show extenuating circumstances, within fifteen calendar days after a lien or mortgage on a motor or off-highway vehicle is paid and satisfied, a lienholder shall release the lien or mortgage as required by subsection (1) of this section.
(2) (a) (I) Except when a lienholder can show extenuating circumstances, within fifteen calendar days after a lien or mortgage on a motor or off-highway vehicle is paid and satisfied, a lienholder shall release the lien or mortgage as required by subsection (1) of this section.

As used in this subsection (2), "extenuating circumstances" means a situation where access to the title is impaired, making good faith compliance with this subsection (2) impossible within the time frame required by this paragraph (a). "Extenuating circumstances" does not include intentional or negligent acts by a lienholder that result in delay beyond the time frame required in this subsection (2).

Any person aggrieved by a violation of this subsection (2) may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction to bring about compliance with this subsection (2) and for any damages arising from the violation.

Mortgage or lien satisfactions may be electronically transmitted to the department's authorized agent as authorized by rules of the director. When electronic transmission of mortgages or liens or mortgage or lien satisfactions is used, a certificate of title need not be issued until the last mortgage or lien is satisfied and a clear certificate of title is issued to the owner of the motor or off-highway vehicle under section 42-6-126.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2460, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

IP(1) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 1665, § 19, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2009:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(b) amended, (HB 09-1089), ch. 196, p. 881, § 3, effective October 1.

L. 2011:

(2) added, (HB 11-1185), ch. 122, p. 383, § 1, effective April 20.

L. 2013:

(1), (2)(a)(I), and (3) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, pp. 2388, 2397, §§ 21, 43, effective June 5; (3) added, (HB 13-1289), ch. 380, p. 2226, § 6, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-124 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-125 was relocated to § 42-6-126.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act adding subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 380, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

42-6-126. New certificate upon release of mortgage.

Upon the satisfaction of the debt and release of a mortgage on a motor or off-highway vehicle filed for record as required by section 42-6-121:

The owner of the vehicle encumbered by the mortgage, the purchaser from or transferee of the owner as appears on the certificate of title, or the holder of a mortgage that was junior to the mortgage released, upon the receipt of the certificate of title, as provided in section 42-6-125, shall deliver the title to the authorized agent, who shall transmit the title to the director; or

The lienholder shall notify the authorized agent of the satisfaction of the debt and release of the mortgage, setting forth any facts concerning the right of the holder to release the mortgage as the director may require. The lienholder shall sign a satisfaction and release that is affirmed by a statement containing or accompanied by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S. Upon receiving a valid satisfaction and release, the director or authorized agent shall note the release of the lien and shall issue a certificate of title for the motor vehicle, omitting all reference to the mortgage.

Upon the receipt by the director of a statement of mortgage release, the director shall:

Note on the records in the director's office to show the release of the lien of the mortgage;

Issue a new certificate of title to the motor or off-highway vehicle, omitting all reference to the released mortgage; and

Dispose of the new certificate of title in the manner prescribed in other cases unless directed otherwise.

For certificates of title that are maintained in an electronic format, any release of lien, mortgage, or encumbrance shall be filed prior to the issuance of a new certificate of title. In the event the holder of the lien, mortgage, or other encumbrance has filed bankruptcy or is no longer in business, the person seeking issuance of a new certificate of title reflecting the release of the lien, mortgage, or other encumbrance, which has been maintained electronically, shall either post a bond with the director in a reasonable amount determined by the director or shall wait until the period of the lien, mortgage, or other encumbrance expires.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2461, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1665, § 20, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1089), ch. 196, p. 881, § 4, effective October 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(a) and (1)(b)(II) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2389, § 22, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-125 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-126 was relocated to § 42-6-127.

42-6-127. Duration of lien of mortgage - extensions - rules.

The lien of a mortgage or refinancing of a mortgage filed in the manner prescribed in section 42-6-121 or 42-6-129 shall remain valid and enforceable for a period of ten years after the filing of the certificate in the office of the director's authorized agent or until the discharge of the mortgage on the vehicle, if the discharge occurs sooner, except in the case of trailer coaches; truck tractors; multipurpose trailers, if known when filed; and motor homes, that are subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section. During the ten-year period or any extension of such period, the lien of the mortgage may be extended for successive three-year periods upon the holder of the mortgage presenting to the director's authorized agent of the county where the mortgage is filed or in the county where the owner resides a certification of extension of chattel mortgage, subscribed by the holder of the mortgage and acknowledged by the holder before an officer authorized to acknowledge deeds to real property, in which shall appear a description of the mortgage on the vehicle, to what extent it has been discharged or remains unperformed, and such other information respecting the mortgage as may be required by appropriate rule of the director to enable the director's authorized agent to properly record the extension.

Upon receipt of a mortgage extension, the authorized agent shall make and complete the electronic record of the extension as the director by rule may require within the director's or the authorized agent's motor and off-highway vehicle database and shall note the fact of the extension of the mortgage on the certificate of title, which may be filed electronically. Thereafter, the authorized agent shall return the certificate to the person shown on the certificate to be entitled to the certificate. If any mortgage other than one on a trailer coach; truck tractor; multipurpose trailer, if known when filed; or motor home has been filed for record and noted on the certificate of title and has not been released or extended within ten years after the date when the mortgage was filed in the office of the authorized agent, the person shown by the records in the director's office to be the owner of the motor or off-highway vehicle described in the certificate of title, upon filing an application, may request that the authorized agent remove references to the mortgages shown on the records. The authorized agent shall remove all reference to mortgages shown in the authorized agent's records to have been of record in the office of the authorized agent for more than ten years without being released or extended.

The duration of the lien of any mortgage on a trailer coach, as defined in section 42-1-102 (106)(a), a truck tractor, as defined in section 42-1-102 (109), a multipurpose trailer, as defined in section 42-1-102 (60.3), or a motor home, as defined in section 42-1-102 (57), shall be for the full term of the mortgage, but the lien of the mortgage may be extended beyond the original term of the mortgage for successive three-year periods by following the procedure prescribed in subsection (1) of this section during the term of the mortgage or any extension thereof.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2461, § 1, effective January 1, 1995; entire section amended, p. 920, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1666, § 21, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1089), ch. 196, p. 882, § 5, effective October 1.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2390, § 23, effective June 5.

42-6-128. Validity of mortgage between parties.

Nothing in this part 1 impairs the validity of a mortgage on a motor or off-highway vehicle between the parties as long as no purchaser for value, mortgagee, or creditor without actual notice of the existence of a mortgage has acquired an interest in the motor or off-highway vehicle described in the mortgage, notwithstanding that the parties to the mortgage have failed to comply with this part 1.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2462, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2390, § 24, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-127 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-128 was relocated to § 42-6-130.

42-6-129. Second or other junior mortgages.

On and after July 1, 1977, a person who takes a junior mortgage on a motor or off-highway vehicle for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued or filed may file the mortgage for public record and have the existence of the mortgage noted or filed on the certificate of title with like effect as in other cases, as required by this section.

The junior mortgagee or the holder of the mortgage shall file the mortgage as required by section 42-6-121 with the authorized agent of the county where the mortgagor of the motor or off-highway vehicle resides or where the vehicle is located with a written request to have the existence of the mortgage noted or filed on the certificate of title records of the authorized agent pertaining to the vehicle covered by the junior mortgage. Upon the filing of the mortgage, the authorized agent shall note in the record of the vehicle the day and hour when the mortgage was received by the agent, shall make and deliver a receipt for the mortgage to the person filing the mortgage, and shall file the mortgage as required under section 42-6-122. If there is more than one mortgage or lien on the motor or off-highway vehicle, the department's authorized agent may electronically transmit the mortgage or lien to the first mortgage or lienholder and notify the first mortgage or lienholder of any additional mortgages or liens.

The director's authorized agent, by registered mail, return receipt requested, shall make a written demand on the holder of the certificate of title, addressed to such person at the person's address as the same may appear in said written request, that such certificate be delivered to the authorized agent for the purpose of having noted on the certificate such second or junior mortgage. Within fifteen days after the receipt of such demand, the person holding such certificate shall either mail or deliver the same to such director's authorized agent or, if the person no longer has possession of the certificate, shall so notify the agent and, if the person knows, shall likewise inform the agent where and from whom such certificate may be procured. Upon the receipt of such certificate, the director's authorized agent shall complete an application for a new title and record the number thereof on the mortgage, as in the case of a first mortgage, and shall, as in the case of a first mortgage, issue and file a new certificate of title on which record the existence of all mortgages on the motor vehicle, including such second or junior mortgage, have been noted.

If a person lawfully in possession of a certificate of title to a motor or off-highway vehicle, upon whom demand is made for the delivery to the authorized agent, fails to deliver or mail the certificate of title to the authorized agent, the person is liable to the holder of the junior mortgage for all damage sustained by reason of the omission.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2462, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1667, § 22, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2013:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, pp. 2391, 2398, §§ 25, 44, effective June 5; (2) amended, (HB 13-1289), ch. 380, p. 2226, § 7, effective June 5.

42-6-130. Priority of secured interests.

The liens or mortgages filed for record or noted on a certificate of title to a motor or off-highway vehicle, as provided in section 42-6-121, take priority in the same order that they were filed with the authorized agent; except that the priority of a purchase-money security interest, as defined in section 4-9-103, C.R.S., is determined in accordance with sections 4-9-317 (e) and 4-9-324 (a), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2463, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1668, § 23, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 818, § 19, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-150), ch. 182, p. 802, § 4, effective April 22.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2391, § 26, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-128 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-130 was relocated to § 42-6-132.

42-6-131. Mechanic's, warehouse, and other liens.

Nothing in this part 1 impairs the rights of lien claimants arising under a mechanic's lien or the lien of a warehouse or other person claimed for repairs on or storage of a motor or off-highway vehicle when a mechanic's lien or storage lien originated prior to a mortgage or lien on the motor or off-highway vehicle being filed for record and the vehicle has remained continuously in the possession of the person claiming the mechanic's lien or lien for storage.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2463, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 818, § 20, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2391, § 27, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-129 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-131 was relocated to § 42-6-133.

42-6-132. Existing mortgages not affected. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2464, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 818, § 21, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (HB 09-1089), ch. 196, p. 883, § 6, effective October 1.

42-6-133. Foreign mortgages and liens.

A mortgage or lien on a motor or off-highway vehicle filed for record in a state other than Colorado is not valid and enforceable against the rights of subsequent purchasers for value, creditors, lienholders, or mortgagees having no actual notice of the existence of the mortgage or lien. If the certificate of title for the vehicle bears any notation adequate to apprise a purchaser, creditor, lienholder, or mortgagee of the existence of a mortgage or lien at the time a third party acquires a right in the motor vehicle, the mortgage or lien and the rights of the holder of the mortgage or lien are enforceable in this state as though the mortgage were filed in Colorado and noted on the certificate of title or noted in the record of the authorized agent for the vehicle under section 42-6-121.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2464, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1668, § 24, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 818, § 22, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2392, § 28, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-131 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-133 was relocated to § 42-6-135.

42-6-134. Where application for certificates of title made.

Except as otherwise provided in this part 1, a person shall apply for recording of a certificate of title upon the sale or transfer of a motor or off-highway vehicle with the authorized agent of the county where the vehicle will be registered for operation. If the certificate of title application is made through a third-party provider, the applicant need not be physically present in the county where the vehicle will be registered if the third-party provider applies for a certificate of title in the county where the vehicle will be registered.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2464, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1668, § 25, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 819, § 23, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2392, § 29, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, p. 1814, § 12, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-132 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-134 was relocated to § 42-6-136.

42-6-135. Lost certificates of title.

If data is lost transmitting an application for a certificate of title and accompanying documentation, which may be transmitted by the authorized agent to the director and upon an appropriate application of the owner or other person entitled to such certificate of title, such certificate of title may be reissued or recorded bearing such notations respecting existing unreleased mortgages or liens on the vehicle as indicated by the director's or authorized agent's records. Such certificate of title shall be issued without charge.

If the title owner, lienholder, or mortgagee of a certificate of title loses, misplaces, or accidentally destroys a certificate of title to a motor or off-highway vehicle that the person holds as described in the certificate of title, upon application, the director or the authorized agent may issue a duplicate copy of the recorded certificate of title as in other cases.

Upon the issuance of a copy of the recorded certificate of title as provided for in this section, the director or the authorized agent shall note on the copy every mortgage shown to be unreleased and the lien that is in effect as disclosed by the records of the director or authorized agent and shall dispose of such certificate as in other cases.

Upon the payment or discharge of the debt secured by a mortgage on a motor vehicle that has been filed for record in the manner prescribed in section 42-6-121, the lienholder shall notify the authorized agent of the satisfaction and release of the mortgage, setting forth any facts concerning the right of the holder to release the mortgage as the director may require. The satisfaction and release shall be affirmed by a statement signed by the lienholder noted in the certificate of title and shall contain or be accompanied by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S. Upon receiving a valid satisfaction and release, the director or authorized agent shall note the release of the lien and shall issue a certificate of title for the motor vehicle, omitting all reference to the mortgage.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2464, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1668, § 26, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 819, § 24, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (HB 09-1089), ch. 196, p. 883, § 7, effective October 1.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2392, § 30, effective June 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-133 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-135 was relocated to § 42-6-137.

Cross references:

For payment of bond for issuance of certificate, see § 42-6-115.

42-6-136. Surrender and cancellation of certificate - penalty for violation.

The owner of a motor or off-highway vehicle for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued, upon the destruction or dismantling of the vehicle or upon its being changed so that it is no longer a motor or off-highway vehicle, shall surrender the certificate of title to the vehicle to the director or the authorized agent or notify the director or the authorized agent on director-approved forms indicating the loss, destruction, or dismantling. Upon receiving the surrendered certificate of title or the notice of loss, destruction, or dismantling, the director or authorized agent shall classify the vehicle as junk.

The department shall not issue a certificate of title to a vehicle classified as junk. The holder of a lien or mortgage secured by the vehicle's title for the purchase shall surrender the title to the department. The department shall cancel the title and remove the vehicle identification number from the motor vehicle database.

Upon the owner's procuring the consent of the holders of unreleased mortgages or liens noted on or recorded as part of the certificate of title, the director or authorized agent shall cancel the certificate.

A person who violates this section commits a class 1 petty offense and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503, C.R.S.

When a motor vehicle owner determines that a motor vehicle for which a Colorado certificate of title has been issued is nonrepairable, the owner of the vehicle shall apply for a nonrepairable title. To be issued a nonrepairable title, an applicant must provide the director with evidence of ownership that satisfies the director of the applicant's right to have a nonrepairable title filed in the applicant's favor. If a motor vehicle is nonrepairable, the director or authorized agent shall issue the vehicle a nonrepairable title.

Upon the owner's procuring the consent of the holder of an unreleased mortgage or lien noted on the certificate of title, the director or authorized agent shall cancel the vehicle's registration.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2014.)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2464, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1669, § 27, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1563, § 375, effective October 1; (3) amended, p. 635, § 1, effective January 1, 2003.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 931, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 819, § 25, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2392, § 31, effective June 5.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (HB 14-1100), ch. 122, p. 434, § 5, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-134 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-6-136 was relocated to § 42-6-138.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

42-6-136.5. Salvage title.

Upon the sale or transfer of a motor vehicle for which a current Colorado certificate of title has been issued or filed and that has become a salvage vehicle, the purchaser or transferee shall apply for a salvage certificate of title. The owner of the vehicle may apply for a salvage certificate of title before the sale or transfer of the vehicle. To be issued a salvage title, an owner applying for a salvage certificate of title must provide the director with evidence of ownership that satisfies the director of the applicant's right to have a salvage certificate of title filed in the applicant's favor.

An owner of a salvage motor vehicle that has been made roadworthy who applies for a certificate of title as provided in section 42-6-116 shall include the information regarding the vehicle as the director may require by rule. To be issued a salvage title, the owner must provide to the director evidence of ownership that satisfies the director that the applicant is entitled to file a certificate of title. The director shall place a designation in a conspicuous place in the record when a salvage vehicle has been made roadworthy. The director shall include the words "REBUILT FROM SALVAGE" and shall make the designation a permanent part of the certificate of title for the vehicle, so that the phrase appears on all subsequent certificates of title for the vehicle.

An owner of a salvage motor vehicle that has been made roadworthy who applies for a certificate of title in accordance with section 42-6-116 shall include a certified VIN inspection in accordance with section 42-5-202 by a certified VIN inspector.

To pass the VIN inspection required by this paragraph (b), the applicant must stamp a motor vehicle with a salvage brand using the words "REBUILT FROM SALVAGE" with each letter being not less than one-fourth inch in height. The brand must be placed in the following locations:

In a motorcycle, on the frame in a visible location;

In a class A manufactured motor home, on the main entrance door jamb;

In a trailer, adjacent to the public vehicle identification number; and

In all other motor vehicles, on the body post to which the driver's door latches, also known as the driver's door B pillar.

Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c), a person commits a class 1 misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, C.R.S., if the person:

A person may remove or alter a salvage brand if necessary to legitimately repair a motor vehicle. To qualify for this exception, the person must provide evidence of the repair to the investigating law enforcement authority. The evidence must include pre-repair and post-repair photographs of the affected motor vehicle part and the salvage brand and a signed affidavit describing the repairs. Upon repair, or subsequent repair, the person or owner must restamp the vehicle.

(A) Intentionally removes or alters a salvage brand; or

(B) Possesses a motor vehicle without retitling the vehicle with a salvage brand for forty-five days after learning that the motor vehicle's salvage brand may have been removed or altered.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1100), ch. 122, p. 436, § 6, effective August 6.

42-6-137. Fees.

Upon filing with the authorized agent an application for a certificate of title, the applicant shall pay to the agent a fee of seven dollars and twenty cents, which shall be in addition to the fees for the registration of such motor vehicle. If the additional fee of seven dollars and twenty cents is collected by a third-party provider, as defined in section 42-1-102, the provider shall collect and remit the fee to the department, who shall transmit the fee to the authorized agent.

Repealed.

Upon the receipt by an authorized agent of a mortgage for filing under section 42-6-121, 42-6-125, or 42-6-129, the filer shall pay the authorized agent the fees that are imposed by law for the filing of like instruments in the office of the county clerk and recorder and, in addition, a fee of seven dollars and twenty cents for the issuance or recording of the certificate of title and the notation of the existence of the mortgage. If the additional fee of seven dollars and twenty cents is collected by a third-party provider, as defined in section 42-1-102, the provider shall collect and remit the fee to the department, who shall transmit the fee to the authorized agent.

Upon application to the authorized agent to have noted or recorded on a certificate of title the extension of a mortgage described in the certificate of title and noted or recorded on the certificate, such authorized agent shall receive a fee of one dollar and fifty cents.

Upon the release and satisfaction of a mortgage and upon application to the authorized agent for the notation on the certificate of title pursuant to section 42-6-125, such authorized agent shall be paid a fee of seven dollars and twenty cents.

For the issuance of a copy of a recorded certificate of title, except as may be otherwise provided in this part 1, the authorized agent shall be paid a fee of eight dollars and twenty cents. If the department assigns a new identifying number to any motor vehicle, the fee charged for such assignment shall be three dollars and fifty cents.

Upon filing with the director an application for a certificate of title, a motor or off-highway vehicle dealer who applies to receive a certificate of title within one working day after application shall pay to the director a fee of twenty-five dollars.

An authorized agent shall, if possible, provide the following recording of titles on the same day as the date of request by an applicant:

A title issued because of a transfer of a motor or off-highway vehicle currently titled in Colorado;

A title issued for a new motor or off-highway vehicle upon filing of a manufacturer's statement of origin without liens; and

Any other title issued or recorded by the director or the authorized agent. The director and authorized agents shall take into account the best service for citizens in the most cost-effective manner, the use of electronic issuance of titles, and consideration of the business plan for issuing titles at county offices.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for any fee in this section, the director by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the director by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2465, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(5) amended, p. 800, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(8) added, p. 1359, § 115, effective June 1; (1), (2), and (5) amended and (7) added, p. 928, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(2), (3), (5), IP(7), and (7)(c) amended, p. 1669, § 28, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(1), (2), and (5) amended, p. 814, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(b)(III) amended, p. 951, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(4) amended, p. 1978, § 4, effective May 22.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 821, § 26, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(2), (6), (7)(a), and (7)(b) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2393, § 32, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, (HB 18-1299), ch. 297, p. 1814, § 13, effective July 1, 2019.

42-6-138. Disposition of fees.

All fees received by the authorized agent under section 42-6-137 (1)(a), (2), or (4) or 38-29-138 (1)(a), (2), or (4), C.R.S., upon application for a certificate of title, shall be disposed of as follows: Four dollars shall be retained by the authorized agent and disposition made as provided by law; three dollars and twenty cents shall be credited to the special purpose account established by section 42-1-211.

Repealed.

The authorized agent shall dispose of all fees collected under section 42-6-137 (5) or 38-29-138 (5), C.R.S., as follows:

For a copy of a recorded certificate of title, six dollars and fifty cents shall be retained by the authorized agent and disposition made as provided by law; and one dollar and seventy cents shall be credited to the special purpose account established by section 42-1-211; and

For assignment of a new identifying number to a motor or off-highway vehicle or manufactured home, the authorized agent shall retain two dollars and fifty cents and dispose of it as provided by law and shall credit one dollar to the special purpose account established by section 42-1-211. The department shall credit all fees it collects under section 42-6-137 (1)(a), (4), or (5) or 38-29-138 (1)(a), (4), or (5), C.R.S., to the special purpose account.

The authorized agent shall retain all fees paid under section 42-6-137 (3) for the extension of a mortgage or lien on a motor or off-highway vehicle filed in the authorized agent's office to defray the cost of the extension or release and shall dispose of the fees as provided by law; except that the authorized agent shall dispose of fees for this service that are paid in the city and county of Denver in the same manner as fees retained by the agent that were paid for filing an application for a certificate of title.

The director shall credit the fee paid by a motor or off-highway vehicle dealer pursuant to section 42-6-137 (6) for issuance of a certificate of title within one working day after application to the special purpose account established by section 42-1-211 (2).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2466, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 800, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 929, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1670, § 29, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 815, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1034, § 76, effective June 1; (1)(b)(II) amended, p. 951, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2003:

(1)(a), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1979, § 5, effective May 22.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 822, § 27, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

IP(2), (2)(b), (3), and (4) amended, (SB 13-280), ch. 407, p. 2393, § 33, effective June 5.